en: potato, potatoes
ab: Акартош
ar: بطاطس
ay: Ch'uqi
be: бульба
bg: картоф, картофи
bi: Kumala
bn: আলু
bo: ཞོ་ཁོག
bs: krompir
ca: patata, patates
cs: brambor, brambory
da: kartoffel, kartofler
de: Kartoffel, Kartoffeln
el: πατάτα, πατάτες
eo: terpomo
es: patata, papas, patatas
et: kartul, kartulid
eu: patata
ff: Kudaku
fi: peruna, perunaa, perunat
fr: pomme de terre, pommes de terre, pommes de terre de consommation
gd: Buntàta
gl: pataca
gu: Yvy'a
he: תפוח אדמה
hi: आलू
hr: krumpir
ht: Pòm tè
hu: burgonya, krumpli
ia: patata
ik: Asiaġruaq
io: Terpomo
it: patata, patate
ja: ジャガイモ, じゃがいも, 馬鈴薯, ポテト
ka: კარტოფილი
ks: اولُو
la: Patata
li: Aerpel
lt: bulvė, bulvės
lv: kartupeļi
mg: Ovy
mk: компир
mr: बटाटा
nb: potet, poteter
ne: आलु
nl: aardappel, aardappelen
nn: potet, poteter
no: potet
nv: Nímasii
or: ଆଳୁ
os: Картоф
pa: ਆਲੂ
pl: ziemniak, ziemniaki, ziemniaczana, ziemniaczane, ziemniaczany, ziemniaków, ziemniaka, ziemniaczanego, ziemniaczanych
pt: batata, batatas
rn: Ikiraya
ro: cartof, cartofi
ru: картофель, картошка
rw: Ikirayi
sl: krompir, zemiak
sm: Pateta
sn: Mbatatisi
so: Barandho
sq: Patatja
sv: potatis, matpotatis
tr: patates
uk: картопля
uz: Kartoshka
wa: Crompire
za: Majlingzsuz
zh: 馬鈴薯
zu: Izambane

en: new potato, new potatoes
fr: pomme de terre nouvelle, pommes de terre nouvelles
it: patata novella

en: table potatoes
de: Speisekartoffeln
it: patate da tavola

en: British potato
de: Britische Kartoffel, Britische Kartoffeln
it: patate britanniche

en: Swedish potato
da: svensk kartoffel
sv: svensk potatis, svensk matpotatis

en: potato flour
bg: брашно от картофи, картофено брашно
es: harina de patata
fi: perunajauho
fr: farine de pomme de terre, farine de pommes de terre, pomme de terre en poudre
hr: krumpirovo brašno
it: Farina di patate
nb: potetmel
nl: aardappelmeel
pl: Mąka ziemniaczana
sv: potatismjöl

en: organic potatos from France
fr: Pommes de terre biologiques origine France
it: patate biologiche dalla Francia

en: precooked potato
de: vorgegarte Kartoffeln, Kartoffeln (vorgegart), Speisekartoffeln gekocht
fr: pommes de terre précuites
hr: prethodno kuhani krumpir
it: patate precotte
ro: cartofi preprăjiți

en: russet potatoes
de: Geröstete Kartoffeln
fr: Pommes de terres rousses
hr: riđi krumpir
it: patate rosse

en: cooked potato
de: gegarte Kartoffeln
es: patata cocida
fi: kypsennetty peruna
fr: pomme de terre cuite, pommes de terre cuites
hr: kuhani krumpir
it: patata cotta
nl: gegaarde aardappel
ro: cartofi fierți
sv: kokt potatis

en: mashed potato, mashed potatoes
ar: بطاطا مهروسة
az: kartof püresi
be: бульбяное пюрэ
bg: картофено пюре, пюре от картофи
bn: আলু ভর্তা
ca: puré de patates
cs: bramborová kaše
cv: токкоми
da: kartoffelmos
de: kartoffelpüree
el: πουρέ πατάτας
eo: terpomkaĉo
es: puré de papas
et: kartulipuder
fa: پوره سیب‌زمینی
fi: perunasose, perunamuusi
fr: purée de pomme de terre, purée de pommes de terre
ga: brúitín
he: מחית תפוחי אדמה
hr: pire krumpir
id: kentang tumbuk
it: purea di patate
ja: マッシュポテト
ko: 매시트 포테이토
la: pulticula ex pomis terrestribus
lt: bulvių košė
ms: kentang lecek
nb: potetmos
nl: aardappelpuree
pt: purê de batata
ru: картофельное пюре
se: buđetnjuvddus
sv: potatismos
th: มันฝรั่งบด
tr: patates püresi
uk: картопляне пюре
zh: 馬鈴薯泥

en: instant mashed potatoes
hr: instant pire krumpir
it: purè di patate istantaneo

en: potato flakes
bg: картофени люспи
da: kartoffelflager
de: Kartoffelflocken
es: copos de patata
fi: perunahiutale, perunahiutaleita
fr: flocon de pomme de terre, flocons de pommes de terre, flocons de pomme de terre
hr: krumpirove pahuljice, pahuljice krumpira
it: fiocco di patata, fiocchi di patate
lv: kartupeļu pārslas
nl: aardappelvlokken
pl: płatki ziemniaczane
ru: картофельние хлопья, картофельные-хлопья
sv: potatisflingor, potatisflinga

en: dehydrated potato flakes
bg: дехидратирани картофени люспи
de: getrocknete Kartoffelflocken
es: copos de patata deshidratados
fi: kuivatut perunahiutaleet
fr: flocons de pomme de terre déshydratés
hr: dehidrirane pahuljice krumpira
it: fiocchi di patate disidratati
sl: krompirjevi kosmiči

en: potato fiber, potato fibre
ca: fibra de patata, fibra vegetal de patata
da: kartoffelfibre
de: Kartoffelfasern, Kartoffelfaser, Kartoffelballaststoffe
es: fibra de patata, fibra vegetal de patata
fi: perunakuitu
fr: fibres de pomme de terre, fibre de pomme de terre, fibres de pommes de terre
hr: krumpirova vlakna
it: fibra di patata
nb: potetfiber
nl: aardappelvezel, aardappelvezels
no: potetfiber, potetfibre
pl: błonnik ziemniaczany
sv: potatisfiber

fr: pommes de terre préfrites
nl: voorgebakken aardappel
sv: forstekt potatis

en: taro
af: Taro
am: ጎደሬ
ar: قلقاس مأكول
be: Colocasia esculenta
bh: अरुई
bi: Taro
bn: কচু
ca: Taro
cs: Kolokázie jedlá
de: Taro
dv: އޮޅު އަލަ
el: Κολοκασία η εδώδιμος
eo: Taro
es: Colocasia esculenta
eu: Taro
fa: تارو
fi: Taaro
fj: Dalo
fr: Colocasia esculenta
gl: Taro
gu: અળવી
ha: Gwaza
he: טארו
hi: अरबी सब्जी
hr: taro
ht: Chou Karayib
hu: Taró
id: Talas
ig: Ede
it: Colocasia esculenta
ja: サトイモ, 里芋, さといも, タロイモ
ka: ტარო
kn: ಕೆಸು
ko: 토란
la: Colocasia esculenta
lt: Valgomoji kolokazija
lv: Kolokāzija
mg: Saonjo
ml: താള്
mr: अळू
ms: Keladi Cina
ne: कर्कलो
nl: Taro
nn: Taro
no: Taro
pa: ਅਰਵੀ
pl: Kolokazja jadalna, taro, eddo, kolokazja, kleśnica, kleśniec jadalny
pt: Taro
rn: Amateke
ru: Таро
sg: Langä
sl: Taro
sm: Talo
sr: Таро
su: Kimpul
sv: Taro
sw: Magimbi
ta: சேம்பு
th: เผือก
tl: Gabi
to: Talo
tr: Gölevez
ty: Taro
uk: Таро
ur: تارو
vi: Colocasia esculenta
za: Biek
zh: 芋
zu: Amadumbe

en: crudités
xx: crudités
de: Crudités
fi: raakavihannekset
he: קרודיטה
nl: rauwkost
zh: 法式生菜沙拉

en: avocado
an: aguacate
ar: الأفوكادو, افوكادو
az: avokado
bg: авокадо
bn: আভোকাদো
br: avoukez
ca: alvocat
cs: avokádo
da: avokado, avocado
de: Avocado
el: αβοκάντο
eo: avokado
es: aguacate
et: avokaado
eu: ahuakate
fi: avokado
fr: avocat
ga: abhacád
gl: aguacate
he: אבוקדו
hi: एवोकाडो
hr: avokado
ht: zaboka
hu: avokádó
hy: ավոկադո
ia: avocato
id: alpukat
ig: ube oyibo
it: avocado
ja: アボカド
ka: ავოკადო
ku: avokado
kw: avokado
lb: Avocado
ln: sabúká
lt: avokadas
ma: rahopūru
mi: rahopūru
mk: авокадо
ml: അവോക്കാഡോ
ms: avokado
nb: avokado
ne: घ्यूँफल
nl: avocado
nn: avokado
pl: awokado, smaczliwka, smaczliwki, awokada
pt: abacate
qu: palta
ro: avocado
ru: авокадо
sk: avokádo
sl: avokado
sq: avokado
sv: avokado, avocado
te: అవోకాడో
tr: avokado
uk: авокадо
vo: Avokaado
yi: אַװאָקאַדאָ
zh: 鳄梨

en: Guacamole
it: guacamole